Illinois, session 104th, HB5354.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Agricultural Fair Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 120/1)  (from Ch. 85, par. 651)7    Sec. 1. This Act may be cited as the the Agricultural Fair 8Act.9(Source: P.A. 77-1208.)